Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 156. ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER OF COMPENSATION AND REIMBURSEMENT OF COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

Sec. 156.001. TRANSFER SYSTEM AUTHORIZED. The county treasurer may establish and operate an electronic funds transfer system to make any authorized transfer from the county treasury.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 343, Sec. 2, eff. May 29, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3439), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 156.003. ADMINISTRATION OF SYSTEM. The county auditor or, if the county does not have a county auditor, the chief financial officer of the county, with the approval of the commissioners court, shall establish the procedures for administering the system and may use the services of financial institutions, automated clearinghouses, and the federal government.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 156.004. TRANSFER TO MULTIPLE PAYEES. A single transfer may contain payments to multiple payees without the necessity of issuing individual warrants for each payee.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 156.005. NO ADDITIONAL RIGHTS CREATED. The use of an electronic funds transfer means of payment does not create any rights that would not have been created if an individual warrant had been used as a means of payment.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.